Washington statutes.
RCW 19.05.060

Labor and industries—Responsibilities.

(1) The department has the following responsibilities related to covered employers, as provided in this chapter:

(a) Educate participating employers of their administrative duties under this chapter;

(b) In the case of noncompliance with employer administrative duties, investigate complaints, educate employers about how to come into compliance, and, in the case of willful violations, issue citations and collect penalties;

(c) In the case of impermissible withholding of amounts due to employees, investigate and enforce the complaint as an alleged violation of a wage payment requirement, as defined in RCW 49.48.082; and

(d) Facilitate a process in which employers may appeal complaints.

(2) Collections of unpaid citations assessing civil penalties by the department under this chapter must be made pursuant to RCW 49.48.086.

[ 2024 c 327 s 6.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2024 c 327: See note following RCW 19.05.020.